Massachusetts, session 194th, H3359.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 4 of chapter 7C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
Notwithstanding section 3 of chapter 40A, or any other general or special law to the
contrary, the division of capital asset management and maintenance shall not approve any
building project which is also a public-private agreement unless said project shall be subject to
local zoning ordinances; and provided, further, that the division shall not approve any building
project which is also a public-private agreement if such project will result in the issuance of a
bond.
of 1